Utah statutes.
78B-13-314.   Appeals.
An appeal may be taken from an order in a proceeding under this chapter in
accordance with expedited appellate procedures in other civil cases.  Unless
the court enters a temporary emergency order under Section 78B-13-204, the
enforcing court may not stay an order enforcing a child custody determination
pending appeal.
